Mississippi, session 2026, HB4176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Paul Jackson of Oktibbeha County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Embezzlement in Lowndes County, on February 14, 2001, for which he was sentenced to serve sixty (60) months probation under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He violated probation, and it was revoked.  On November 18, 2005, in Lowndes County, he was sentenced to serve one (1) year in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections, and three (3) years probation. He was released to parole to Earned Release Supervision on May 9, 2006.  He was discharged on October 18, 2007.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.